en: Blueberry sorbets
bg: Сорбет от боровинки
de: Heidelbeersorbets
es: Sorbetes de arándano
fi: Mustikkasorbetit
fr: Sorbets à la myrtille
he: סורבה תותי יער
hr: Sorbeti od borovnice
it: Sorbetto ai mirtilli
ja: ブルーベリーソルベ
lt: Mėlynių šerbetai
nl: Blauwe bessensorbets
pl: Sorbet z jagód
ru: Сорбет из черники

en: Blackberry sorbets
de: Brombeersorbets
es: Sorbetes de mora
fr: Sorbets à la mûre
hr: Sorbeti od kupina
it: Sorbetto di more
lt: Šaltalankių šerbetai
nl: Bramensorbets

en: Mango sorbets
da: Mangosorbeter
de: Mango Sorbets
es: Sorbetes de mango
fr: Sorbets à la mangue
hr: Sorbeti od manga
it: Sorbetto al mango
lt: Mangų šerbetai
nl: Mangosorbets
sv: Mangosorbeter

en: Pineapple sorbets, Ananas sorbets
es: Sorbete de piña
fr: Sorbets à l'ananas
hr: Ananas sorbeti
it: Sorbetto all'ananas
lt: Ananasiniai šerbetai
nl: Ananassorbet

en: Banana sorbets
de: Bananen-Sorbets
es: Sorbetes de plátano
fr: Sorbets à la banane
hr: Sorbeti od banane
it: Sorbetto alla banana
lt: Bananų šerbetas
nl: Bananensorbets

en: Kiwifruit sorbets, Kiwi sorbets
de: Kiwi-Sorbets
es: Sorbetes de kiwi
fr: Sorbets au kiwi
hr: Sorbeti od kivija
it: Sorbetto al kiwi
lt: Kivio šerbetas
nl: Kiwi sorbets

en: Fig sorbets
es: Sorbetes de higo
fr: Sorbets à la figue
hr: Sorbeti od smokava
it: Sorbetto al fico
lt: Figų šerbetas
nl: Vijgensorbets

en: Plum sorbets
es: Sorbetes de ciruela
fr: Sorbets à la mirabelle
hr: Sorbeti od šljiva
lt: Slyvų šerbetai
nl: Pruimensorbets

en: Pear sorbets
de: Birnensorbets
es: Sorbetes de pera
fr: Sorbets à la poire
hr: Sorbeti od krušaka
it: Sorbetto alle pere
lt: Kriaušių šerbetai
nl: Perensorbets

en: Apple sorbets
de: Apfelsorbets
es: Sorbetes de manzana
fr: Sorbets à la pomme
hr: Sorbeti od jabuka
it: Sorbetto alla mela
lt: Obuolių šerbetai
nl: Appelsorbets

en: Lemon sorbets, Frosted lemon sorbets
de: Zitronen Sorbets
es: Sorbetes de limón
fi: sitruunasorbetit
fr: Sorbets au citron, Sorbets au citron givré
hr: Sorbeti od limuna
it: Sorbetto al limone
lt: Citrininiai šerbetai
nl: Citroensorbets

en: Lime sorbets
es: Sorbetes de lima
fr: Sorbets au citron vert
hr: Sorbeti od limete
it: Sorbetto al lime
lt: Žaliųjų citrinų šerbetai
nl: Limoensorbets

en: Passion fruit sorbets
da: Passionsfrugtsorbeter
de: Passionsfrucht Sorbets
es: Sorbetes de maracuyá, Sorbetes de fruta de la pasión
fr: Sorbets au fruit de la passion, sorbets aux fruits de la passion, sorbets passion, sorbets maracuja
hr: Sorbeti od marakuje
it: Sorbetto al frutto della passione
lt: Pasiflorų šerbetai
nl: Passievruchtsorbets
sv: Passionfruktsorbeter

en: Peach sorbets
fr: Sorbets à la pêche
hr: Sorbeti od breskve
it: Sorbetto alla pesca
lt: Persikų šerbetai

en: Apricot sorbets
fr: Sorbets à l'abricot
hr: Sorbeti od marelica
it: Sorbetto all'albicocca
lt: Abrikosų šerbetai

en: Coconut sorbets
fr: Sorbets à la noix de coco
hr: Sorbeti od kokosa
it: Sorbetto al cocco
lt: Kokosiniai šerbetai

en: Blackcurrant sorbets, Blackcurrent sorbets
fr: Sorbets au cassis
hr: Sorbet od crnog ribiza
lt: Gervuogių šerbetai

en: Cherry sorbets
da: Kirsebærsorbeter
fr: Sorbets à la cerise
hr: Sorbeti od višanja
it: Sorbetto alla ciliegia
lt: Vyšnių šerbetai

en: Melon sorbets
da: Melonsorbeter
fr: Sorbets au melon
hr: Sorbeti od dinje
it: Sorbetto al melone
lt: Melionų šerbetai
nl: Meloensorbet
sv: Melonsorbeter

en: Watermelon sorbets
da: Vandmelonsorbeter
sv: Vattenmelonsorbeter